Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201860-6,268
Use of restraint system or occupant
protection system; violations; penalty; enforcement; when.

(1)
A person violating any provision of subsection (1) or (2) of section 60-6,267 shall be guilty of
an infraction as defined in section 29-431 and shall be fined twenty-five
dollars for each violation. The failure to provide a child restraint system
for more than one child in the same vehicle at the same time, as required
in such subsection, shall not be treated as a separate offense.

(2) Enforcement of subsection (2)
or (8) of
section 60-6,267 shall be accomplished only as a secondary action when an
operator of a motor vehicle has been cited or charged with a violation or
some other offense unless the violation involves a person under the age of
eighteen years riding in or on any portion of the vehicle not designed or
intended for the use of passengers when the vehicle is in motion.

Laws 1983, LB 306, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,103.02;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 364;

Laws 2000, LB 410, § 2;

Laws 2002, LB 1073, § 2;

Laws 2004, LB 227, § 3;

Laws 2011, LB67, § 2.